Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2179
Judgment.

After all the shares and interests of the parties have been settled in any of the methods aforesaid, judgment shall be rendered confirming those shares and interests, and directing partition to be made accordingly.

R.S.1867, Code § 811, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8294;

C.S.1922, § 9247;

C.S.1929, § 20-2179;

R.S.1943, § 25-2179.

In enacting section 25-1315, the Legislature did not amend the partition statutes or attempt to change the effect of our prior jurisprudence. Both before and after the adoption of section 25-1315, this section characterized the settlement of all ownership rights as a "judgment" and our case law characterizes the order as a final order. Guardian Tax Partners v. Skrupa Invest. Co., 295 Neb. 639, 889 N.W.2d 825 (2017).

The language in Peterson v. Damoude, 95 Neb. 469, 145 N.W. 847 (1914), concerning the appealability of orders in a partition action, harmonizes the final order language of section 25-1902 with the partition procedure mandated by this section. Guardian Tax Partners v. Skrupa Invest. Co., 295 Neb. 639, 889 N.W.2d 825 (2017).

An affirmative judgment in favor of a cross-petitioner on a tax sale certificate can be obtained in a partition suit. Fairley v. Kemper, 174 Neb. 565, 118 N.W.2d 754 (1962).

Where partition suit is amicable and for benefit of all parties, court may allow a reasonable attorney's fee to be paid by parties in proportion to their interests. Mabry v. Mudd, 132 Neb. 610, 272 N.W. 574 (1937).

When partition has been ordered, no appeal lies until same has been effected and confirmed. Peterson v. Damoude, 98 Neb. 370, 152 N.W. 786 (1915); Peterson v. Damoude, 95 Neb. 469, 145 N.W. 847 (1914).

Judgment fixing shares is a final judgment and is res judicata of the interests of the parties. Staats v. Wilson, 76 Neb. 204, 107 N.W. 230 (1906).